Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Article 1. In General.
§ 65-1-161.
Authorization for Office of General Services to convey right-of-way across certain lands.

The Governor’s Office of General Services, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, is authorized, in its discretion, to convey to the Mississippi State Highway Department, on behalf of the Mississippi School for the Deaf, the Mississippi School for the Blind and the Mississippi Agriculture and Forestry Museum, a right-of-way row easement across real property described as follows:

PARCEL NO. 1

Begin at the point of intersection of the present Easterly right-of-way line of Interstate Highway No. 55 North with the present Northerly right-of-way line of Eastover Drive, said point of beginning is 2,077.4 feet North and 362.1 feet East of the Southwest corner of the Northwest 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of Section 25, Township 6 North, Range 1 East; from said point of beginning run thence Northerly along said present Easterly right-of-way line the following: North 28 degrees 57’ East, a distance of 842.4 feet; thence run South 61 degrees 09’ East, a distance of 15.0 feet; thence run North 28 degrees 35’ East, a distance of 439.5 feet; thence run Northeasterly along the circumference of a circle to the right having a radius of 676.78 feet, a distance of 183.9 feet to the Northerly line of grantors property; thence run North 88 degrees 46’ East along said Northerly property line, a distance of 84.4 feet to a point on a line that is parallel with and 26 feet Easterly of the centerline of survey of the relocation of the East Frontage Road as shown on the plans for Federal Aid Project No. 51-0055-02-085-10; thence run Southerly along said parallel line along the circumference of a circle to the left having a radius of 5,703.58 feet, a distance of 119.3 feet; thence run South 32 degrees 01’ West, a distance of 49.9 feet; thence run Southerly along a line that is parallel with and 30 feet Easterly of the centerline of survey of said relocation and along the circumference of a circle to the left having a radius of 5,699.58 feet, a distance of 149.2 feet to a point that is 30 feet Easterly of and measured radially to the centerline of survey of said relocation at Station 9278 + 00; thence run South 55 degrees 08’ East, a distance of 50.0 feet; thence run Southerly along a line that is parallel with and 80 feet Easterly of the centerline of survey of said relocation and along the circumference of a circle to the left having a radius of 5,649.58 feet, a distance of 64.1 feet to a point that is 80 feet Easterly of and measured radially to the centerline of survey of said relocation at Station 9277 + 35; thence run South 74 degrees 58’ West, a distance of 45.8 feet; thence run South 50 degrees 26’ West, a distance of 51.8 feet; thence run South 38 degrees 52’ West, a distance of 50.0 feet to a point on that is 30 feet Easterly of and measured radially to the centerline of survey of said relocation at Station 9276 + 00; thence run Southerly along a line that is parallel with and 30 feet Easterly of the centerline of survey of said relocation and along the circumference of a circle to the left having a radius of 5,699.58 feet, a distance of 135.9 feet; thence continue Southerly along the last mentioned parallel line and along the circumference of a circle to the left having a radius of 14,293.95 feet, a distance of 212.9 feet to a point that is 30 feet Easterly of and measured radially to the centerline of survey at said relocation at Station 9272 + 50; thence run South 16 degrees 22’ West, a distance of 102.8 feet; thence run Southerly along a line that is parallel with and 55 feet Easterly of the centerline of survey of said relocation and along the circumference of a circle to the left having a radius of 14,268.95 feet, a distance of 249.0 feet to a point that is 55 feet Easterly of and measured radially to the centerline of survey of said relocation at Station 9269 + 00; thence run South 24 degrees 28’ West, a distance of 61.6 feet to a point that is 60 feet Easterly of and perpendicular to the centerline of survey of said relocation at Station 9268 + 38.364; thence run South 29 degrees 00’ West, along a line that is parallel with and 60 feet Easterly of the centerline of survey of said relocation, a distance of 188.4 feet to a point that is 60 feet Easterly of and perpendicular to the centerline of survey of said relocation at Station 9266 + 50; thence run South 25 degrees 35’ West, a distance of 43.7 feet to a point on the present Northerly right-of-way line of said Eastover Drive; thence run North 61 degrees 15’ West along said present Northerly right-of-way line, a distance of 68.3 feet to the point of beginning, containing 91,284.03 square feet or 2.096 acres, more or less, and all being situated in and a part of the West 1/2 of the Southwest 1/4 of Section 24, Township 6 North, Range 1 East, City of Jackson, First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi and

PARCEL NO. 2

Begin at a point that is 60 feet Easterly of and perpendicular to the centerline of survey of the relocation of the East Frontage Road as shown on the plans for Federal Aid Project No. 51-0055-02-085-10 at Highway Survey Station 9266 + 50, said point of beginning is 2,084.0 feet North of and 440.8 feet East of the Southwest corner of the Northwest 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of Section 25, Township 6 North, Range 1 East; from said point of beginning run thence South 02 degrees 26’ West, a distance of 11.2 feet to a point that is 65 feet Easterly of and perpendicular to the centerline of survey of said relocation at Station 9266 + 40; thence run South 56 degrees 22’ East, a distance of 38.7 feet to a point that is 70 feet Northerly of and perpendicular to the centerline of survey of the relocation of Eastover Drive as shown on the plans of said highway project at Station 12 + 45; thence run North 42 degrees 23’ East, a distance of 41.2 feet; thence run South 61 degrees 39’ East, a distance of 30.0 feet; thence run South 12 degrees 24’ West, a distance of 36.4 feet to a point that is 75 feet Northerly of and perpendicular to the centerline of relocation of said Eastover Drive at Station 12 + 95; thence run South 56 degrees 27’ East, a distance of 55.2 feet; thence run South 61 degrees 39’ East along a line that is parallel with and 70 feet Northerly of the centerline of survey of the relocation of said Eastover Drive, a distance of 120.0 feet; thence run South 81 degrees 18’ East, a distance of 74.3 feet; thence run South 61 degrees 39’ East, a distance of 21.9 feet; thence run South 42 degrees 09’ East, a distance of 30.1 feet; thence run South 03 degrees 43’ East, a distance of 56.5 feet to a point on the present Northerly right-of-way line of said Eastover Drive that is 37.33 feet Northerly of and measured radially to the centerline of relocation of said Eastover Drive at Station 16 + 20; thence run North 61 degrees 15’ West along said present Northerly right-of-way line, a distance of 416.6 feet; thence run North 25 degrees 35’ East, a distance of 43.7 feet to the point of beginning, containing 16,721.53 square feet or 0.384 acres, more or less, and all being situated in and a part of the Southwest 1/4 of the Southwest 1/4 of Section 24, Township 6 North, Range 1 East, City of Jackson, First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi. No access will be permitted across the retaining wall between Point “C” and Point “D” as shown on the right-of-way plans for the above mentioned Federal Aid Highway Project.

PARCEL NO. 3

Begin at the point of intersection of the present Easterly right-of-way line of Interstate Highway No. 55 North with the present Southerly right-of-way line of Eastover Drive, said point of beginning is 2009.9 feet North of and 318.9 feet East of the Southwest corner of the Northwest 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of Section 25, Township 6 North, Range 1 East; from said point of beginning run thence South 61 degrees 15’ East along said present Southerly right-of-way line of Eastover Drive, a distance of 75.7 feet; thence run South 29 degrees 00’ West, a distance of 26.4 feet to a point that is 65 feet Easterly of and measured radially to the centerline of survey of the relocation of the East Frontage Road as shown on the plans for Federal Aid Project No. 51-0055-02-085-10 at Station 9265 + 00; thence run South 31 degrees 57’ West, a distance of 336.1 feet to a point that is 55 feet Easterly of and perpendicular to the centerline of relocation of said East Frontage Road at Station 9261 + 66.667; thence run South 33 degrees 57’ West, a distance of 116.8 feet; thence run South 38 degrees 39’ West, a distance of 160.9 feet; thence run South 37 degrees 02’ West, a distance of 40.4 feet to a point that is 26 feet Easterly of and measured radially to the centerline of survey of said East Frontage Road relocation at Station 9258 + 50; thence run Southerly along a line that is parallel with and 26 feet Easterly of said centerline of said East Frontage Road relocation and along the circumference of a circle to the left having a radius of 7613.44 feet, a distance of 80.9 feet to a Southerly line of grantors’ property; thence run North 61 degrees 51’ West along said Southerly property line, a distance of 10.3 feet to a point on the present Easterly right-of-way line of Interstate Highway No. 55 North; thence run North 27 degrees 56’ East along said present Easterly right-of-way line, a distance of 120.6 feet; thence run North 28 degrees 57’ East along said present Easterly right-of-way line, a distance of 637.0 feet to the point of beginning, containing 37,759.63 square feet or 0.867 acres, more or less, and all being situated in and a part of the Southeast 1/4 of the Southeast 1/4 of Section 23, and the Southwest 1/4 of the Southwest 1/4 of Section 24, all in Township 6 North, Range 1 East, City of Jackson, First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, and

PARCEL NO. 4

Begin at a point that is 65 feet Easterly of and measured radially to the centerline of survey of the relocation of the East Frontage Road as shown on the plans for Federal Aid Project No. 51-005-02-085-10 at Station 9265 + 00, said point of beginning is 1950.4 feet North of and 372.5 feet East of the Southwest corner of the Northwest 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of Section 25, Township 6 North, Range 1 East; from said point of beginning run thence North 29 degrees 00’ East, a distance of 26.4 feet to a point on the present Southerly right-of-way line of Eastover Drive; thence run South 61 degrees 15’ East along said present Southerly right-of-way line of Eastover Drive, a distance of 409.6 feet to a point that is 42.68 feet Southerly of and measured radially to Station 16 + 15 on the centerline of the relocation of said Eastover Drive as shown on the plans for said project; thence run South 62 degrees 15’ West, a distance of 44.8 feet; thence run North 89 degrees 56’ West, a distance of 31.5 feet to a point that is 95 feet Southerly of and perpendicular to the centerline of said relocation of Eastover Drive at Station 15 + 61.925; thence run North 58 degrees 32’ West, a distance of 92.1 feet; thence run South 42 degrees 23’ West, a distance of 61.8 feet; thence run North 61 degrees 39’ West, a distance of 30.0 feet; thence run North 28 degrees 21’ East, a distance of 95.0 feet to a point that is 55 feet Southerly of and perpendicular to the centerline of said relocation of Eastover Drive at Station 14 + 25; thence run North 61 degrees 39’ West, a distance of 75.0 feet; thence run North 67 degrees 22’ West, a distance of 100.5 feet; thence run North 63 degrees 27’ West, a distance of 45.2 feet to the point of beginning, containing 14,868.52 square feet or 0.341 acres, more or less, and all being situated in and a part of the Southwest 1/4 of the Southwest 1/4 of Section 24, Township 6 North, Range 1 East, City of Jackson, First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi. No access will be permitted across the retaining wall between Point “A” and Point “B” as shown on the right-of-way plans for the above mentioned Federal Aid Highway Project.

PARCEL NO. 5

Begin at the point of intersection of the North line of grantors’ property with the present Easterly right-of-way line of Interstate Highway No. 55, said point is 0.4 feet North of and 745.9 feet West of the Northeast corner of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 26, Township 6 North, Range 1 East; from said point of beginning run thence East along the North line of grantors’ property, a distance of 22.32 feet to a line that is 26 feet Easterly of and parallel with the centerline of the relocation of the East Frontage Road as shown on the plans for Federal Aid Project No. 51-0055-02-085-10; thence run Southeasterly along said parallel line and along the circumference of a circle to the left having a radius of 1611.02 feet, a distance 53.76 feet to the present Easterly right-of-way line of said Interstate Highway No. 55, thence run North 12 degrees 30’ West along said present Easterly right-of-way line, a distance of 47.16 feet; thence run North 05 degrees 53’ East along said present Easterly right-of-way line, a distance of 6.22 feet to the point of beginning, containing 621.05 square feet or 0.014 acres, more or less, and being situated in and a part of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 26, Township 6 North, Range 1 East, City of Jackson, First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 392, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1988).

§ 65-1-163.
Disposition of proceeds of sale authorized by Section 65-1-161.

When the property described in Section 65-1-161 is conveyed to the Mississippi Highway Department as authorized, the proceeds from this conveyance of parcels 1, 2, 3 and 4, shall be deposited to the credit of the Mississippi School for the Deaf and the Mississippi School for the Blind, in a special account created in the State Treasury for the use of the Governor’s Office of General Services, Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management for the renovation of capital improvements of buildings and grounds on school property. The proceeds from the conveyance of the property in parcel 5 shall be deposited to the credit of Special Fund Account of the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce for the use and benefit of the Mississippi Agriculture and Forestry Museum. Monies in the special funds shall be expended only upon appropriation by the Legislature and upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers. Any monies appropriated from the special funds shall be in addition to other legislative appropriations which shall not be reduced because of the existence of the special fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 392, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1988).

§ 65-1-165.
Contract for development of comprehensive statewide litter prevention program.

The State Highway Department is hereby authorized to execute a contract with Keep Mississippi Beautiful, Inc., to develop and implement a comprehensive statewide program of litter prevention. The contract shall contain provisions to require that Keep Mississippi Beautiful, Inc., will:

Encourage and assist local communities to become certified Keep America Beautiful systems.

Serve as a state clearinghouse of information on ideas and projects to make local litter prevention programs more effective.

Implement statewide communication programs to alert people to the problem of littering and how it can be corrected.

Coordinate an annual statewide project which will heighten public awareness of the problem of littering.

Establish an annual awards program to recognize individual and community achievement in litter prevention.

Serve as the authority which approves and disburses financial assistance to any nonprofit corporation, county or municipality which, in a written application, seeks such assistance to implement a local litter prevention project. The financial assistance authorized herein shall not exceed forty percent (40%) of the cost of the local litter prevention project for which such assistance is sought.

Encourage donation of funds from the private sector to assist in defraying the operation of the litter prevention program implemented pursuant to this section.

The contract may include any additional provisions which the highway department deems necessary to effectuate the litter prevention program contemplated by this section.

Keep Mississippi Beautiful, Inc., shall submit to the highway department on or before August 1 of each year a written report detailing the operation of the litter prevention program statewide and its expenditure of monies for such program during the preceding state fiscal year.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 574, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 65-1-167.
Statewide litter prevention fund.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Statewide Litter Prevention Fund. Monies may be expended out of such fund, pursuant to appropriation by the Legislature, to implement the statewide litter prevention program established under the provisions of Section 65-1-165. Disbursements from such fund shall be made only upon requisition of the Director of the State Highway Department with the approval of the State Highway Commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 524, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 65-1-169.
Removal or termination of obstructions, encroachments and unauthorized uses of property acquired for highway purposes.

The State Highway Commission is hereby authorized to maintain property acquired for highway purposes free and clear of any obstruction, encroachment or any other use not authorized by the commission. Before removing or terminating any obstruction, encroachment or other unauthorized use, the State Highway Commission shall give notice by registered mail to the offending party of its intention to remove or terminate such obstruction, encroachment or other unauthorized use unless, within forty-five (45) days from the date such notice is mailed, the offending party institutes a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction with respect to the removal or termination proposed by the Highway Commission. When the State Highway Commission has removed or terminated any obstruction, encroachment or other unauthorized use after the mailing of notice as required above and upon the failure of the offending party to institute an action within the forty-five-day time period, the Highway Commission may institute a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction against the offending party for all costs incurred in the removal or termination thereof.

The State Highway Commission, the State Highway Department and State Highway Department personnel shall not be liable, civilly or criminally, for any property damages or personal injuries incurred by any person for the removal or termination of such obstruction, encroachment or unauthorized use in accordance with the provisions of this section provided that reasonable care is exercised in the termination or removal of the obstruction, encroachment or unauthorized use. The provisions of this section shall not be construed as a waiver, in whole or in part, of the sovereign immunity of the state, the State Highway Commission or the State Highway Department.

The provisions of this section shall apply only to the removal or termination of obstructions, encroachments or other unauthorized uses of property acquired for highway purposes which first occur or are created on or after July 1, 1988. The provisions of this section shall not apply to or affect any right or remedy which the State Highway Commission was authorized by law prior to July 1, 1988, to exercise in the removal or termination of any such obstructions, encroachments or other unauthorized uses occurring or created before July 1, 1988.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 559, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 65-1-171.
Construction of bridge across Pearl River at City of Jackson connecting counties of Rankin and Hinds.

Pursuant to federal appropriations for transportation system improvements, the Mississippi Department of Transportation is hereby authorized and empowered to construct a road and bridge along the following route: Begin at or near North State Street in the City of Jackson’s central business district and extend in an easterly direction across the Pearl River to Mississippi 475 at or near the entrance to the Jackson International Airport, for a total distance of approximately 4.6 miles. Final roadway alignment will be determined by a feasibility study.

To defray the cost of the project, the department shall utilize only monies made available to it from the boards of supervisors and the governing authorities of the counties and municipalities within which such project is located; however, the department may utilize state funds to match any federal funds which are specially provided for preliminary engineering, right-of-way acquisition and construction for the connections between I-55 and Mississippi 475 at or near the entrance to the Jackson International Airport, in addition to those federal funds with obligational authority as are regularly apportioned and appropriated to the State of Mississippi for highway purposes. Accessory improvements shall be made to local streets to accommodate traffic generated by the project. All improvements shall conform to congressional appropriations enacted for planning and construction of the project.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 474, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 587, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 564 § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 557, § 41, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 65-1-173.
Employment of inspectors to enforce and investigate violations of railroad laws and related mandates.

For the purpose of enforcing and investigating all violations of the railroad laws, and the rules, regulations and general orders of the Mississippi Transportation Commission promulgated thereunder, the commission is hereby authorized to employ five (5) inspectors and one (1) railway safety coordinator. The salaries of the inspectors and the safety coordinator shall be fixed by the commission, subject to the state personnel system law as provided under Section 25-9-101 et seq. The inspectors shall devote their full time to the performance of their duties and shall take an oath faithfully to perform the duties of their positions. The commission shall require bonds to be carried on such employees as the commission may deem necessary, the cost thereof to be paid by the commission.

The inspectors shall be selected after an examination, as prescribed by the commission, as to physical and mental fitness, knowledge of the railroad laws, the rules and regulations of the commission, the laws of this state pertaining to arrest and any other examination as may be prescribed by the commission. An inspector, at the time of appointment, shall be a citizen of the State of Mississippi, of good moral character, and shall not be less than twenty-one (21) years of age.

The inspectors of the Mississippi Transportation Commission may enter upon private property upon which a railroad facility is located that is connected to but not a part of the general railroad system of transportation, at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner to perform an inspection, investigation or surveillance of facilities, equipment, records and operations relating to the packaging, loading or transportation of hazardous materials or other materials to determine whether the railroad facility complies with the applicable federal or state safety statutes, rules, regulations or orders. Any inspection, investigation or surveillance performed on the site of a manufacturing facility shall be performed in compliance with the safety rules or regulations of the facility.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 58; Laws, 1997, ch. 500, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 550, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 13, 1998).

§ 65-1-175.
Jurisdiction and powers of Department of Transportation with respect to roadway/railway crossings.

The jurisdiction of the Mississippi Department of Transportation shall be exclusive with respect to public roadway/railroad crossings either at grade or otherwise except to the extent that its jurisdiction is preempted by valid federal statute, regulation or order.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall have power, upon its own motion or upon complaint filed, after having made proper investigation, and after notice and hearing, if requested, to abolish any public roadway/railroad crossing heretofore or hereafter established, to vacate and close that part of the roadway on such crossing abolished, and to erect barricades across the roadway in such a manner as to prevent the use of such crossing as a roadway, when, in the opinion of the department, the public necessity served by the crossing in question is not such as to justify the further retention thereof. In any event, if a roadway/railway crossing is the subject of closure proceedings, both the local governmental entity and the rail carrier shall be given formal written notice by the department before any hearing is conducted by the department. However, a public hearing by the department to abolish a crossing shall not be required when the public roadway authority in interest vacates the roadway. In such instances, the rail carrier, following notification to the department and roadway authority, shall remove any grade crossing warning devices and the grade crossing surface.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall have power, upon its own motion, or upon complaint, and after having made proper investigation and after notice and hearing, if requested, to require the installation of adequate and appropriate luminous reflective warning signs, luminous flashing signals, crossing gates illuminated at night, or other warning devices in order to promote the health and safety of the public. Luminous flashing signals or crossing gate devices heretofore installed at grade crossings and those installations hereafter approved by the department shall be deemed adequate and appropriate. The department shall have authority to determine the number, type and location of such signs, signals, gates or other protective devices which shall conform as near as may be with generally recognized national standards, and the department shall have authority to prescribe the division of the cost of the installation and subsequent maintenance of such signs, signals, gates or other warning devices between the rail carrier or carriers, the public highway authority in interest and the Mississippi Department of Transportation. In no event shall any costs assessed against either the public highway authority in interest or the rail carrier exceed ten percent (10%) of the costs of the materials and installation.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as amending, repealing or modifying any duty or responsibility that railroads had, if any, immediately before July 1, 1992, with regard to any applicable state or federal laws, statutes, regulations or orders pertaining to the maintenance of signals, signs and warning devices at roadway/railroad crossings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 60; Laws, 2007, ch. 572, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 65-1-177.
Department of Transportation, in consultation with Southern High-Speed Rail Commission and the Mississippi Development Authority, to promote passenger rail service and make recommendations regarding passenger rail infrastructure.

Working in consultation with the Southern High-Speed Rail Commission created in Section 57-45-1 and the Mississippi Development Authority, the Mississippi Department of Transportation shall promote passenger rail travel and service in the state and make recommendations for specific projects related to the construction, rehabilitation, maintenance, and improvement of the state’s passenger rail infrastructure, which shall include, but are not limited to, the following aspects:

Insuring compatibility for a project or projects with opportunities for the state to obtain federal funding assistance that may be available for high-speed passenger rail service, which includes, but is not limited to, intercity passenger rail service that is capable of reaching speeds of one hundred ten (110) miles per hour; and

Considering projects that create a series of corridor route rail segments with passenger service areas that are smaller than long-distance passenger trains and seek to connect major city pairs, in order to provide improved service at peak travel times and a higher frequency of trains.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 497, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 65-1-179.
Emergency Road and Bridge Repair Fund created; use of funds; Emergency Road and Bridge Repair Fund Advisory Board.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the “Emergency Road and Bridge Repair Fund,” into which shall be deposited money appropriated by the Legislature or otherwise made available in any manner, and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into the fund. The expenditure of money deposited into the fund shall be under the direction of the Mississippi Department of Transportation, and such funds shall be paid by the Mississippi Department of Transportation upon warrants issued by the Department of Finance and Administration.

Money in the fund shall be utilized by the Mississippi Department of Transportation, with the advice of the Emergency Road and Bridge Repair Fund Advisory Board, to provide funding for emergency repairs to roads, streets and highways in this state and emergency bridge repairs on public roads, streets and highways in this state, as determined by a unanimous vote of the Mississippi Transportation Commission. However, before the expenditure of money in the fund, the department shall promulgate rules and regulations as authorized in subsection (3) of this section.

There is created the Emergency Road and Bridge Repair Fund Advisory Board which shall consist of the following members:

The President and Chief Executive Officer of the Mississippi Economic Council;

The President and Chief Executive Officer of the Mississippi Manufacturers Association;

The President of the Mississippi Farm Bureau Federation;

The President of the Mississippi Poultry Association;

The President of the Mississippi Trucking Association;

The Executive Director of the Mississippi Association of Supervisors;

The Executive Director of the Mississippi Municipal League;

The Executive Vice President of the Mississippi Cattlemen’s Association;

The Executive Director of the Mississippi Loggers Association; and

The Executive Director of the American Council of Engineering Companies-Mississippi.

The Governor shall appoint the chairman of the board and the board shall elect such other officers as it considers necessary from among its members.

A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of meetings and all actions of the board shall be by a majority vote. No compensation, per diem or mileage expense shall be provided board members.

The Governor’s office shall provide any necessary administrative support to the board.

The board shall meet at least quarterly to conduct business.

The board shall provide nonbinding advice to the Department of Transportation regarding the expenditure of money in the Emergency Road and Bridge Repair Fund.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the program established under this section to maximize all potential sources of funding including state and federal, for projects covered by the program. Any available sources of funding may be combined to fund any project covered by the program. This includes state aid road funds and/or Local System Bridge Replacement and Rehabilitation Program funds, which may be used in conjunction with Emergency Road and Bridge Repair Fund monies within the discretion of the State Aid Engineer. Under no circumstances, however, shall Emergency Road and Bridge Repair Fund monies be used to reimburse any amount that has been expended on the project prior to the award of such monies to the recipient.

When monies in the Emergency Road and Bridge Repair Fund are distributed for projects, such monies shall not be re-deposited in the State Treasury, absent extraordinary circumstances where the recipient must return monies received under the program. This requirement is not intended to inhibit state agencies from receiving Emergency Road and Bridge Repair Fund monies for appropriate projects or to curtail any proper transfer of monies to accomplish such a project.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, necessary for the implementation of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved August 29, 2018); Laws, 2019, ch. 475, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 2019).